Maryland, session 2025, HB0069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1702.
(a) There is an Office of Recycling created within the Department.
(d) The Office shall:
(1) Assist the counties in developing an acceptable recycling plan required
under § 9–1703 of this subtitle and § 9–505 of this title, including technical assistance to
the local governments;
(2) Coordinate the efforts of the State to facilitate the implementation of
the recycling goals at the county level;
(3) Review all recycling plans submitted as part of a county plan as
required under § 9–505 of this title and advise the Secretary on the adequacy of the
recycling plan;
(4) Administer the Statewide Electronics Recycling Program under Part IV
of this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 69 3
(5) ADMINISTER THE POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT
PROGRAM UNDER SUBTITLE 27 OF THIS TITLE;
[(5)] (6) Promote the development of markets for recycled materials and
recycled products in the State in accordance with § 9–1702.1 of this subtitle; and
[(6)] (7) Review and approve plans and annual reports, including the
paint stewardship assessment, submitted in accordance with a Paint Stewardship Program
established under Part V of this subtitle.
9–1707.
(f) (1) There is a State Recycling Trust Fund.
(2) The Fund shall consist of:
(i) The newsprint recycling incentive fee;
(ii) The telephone directory recycling incentive fee collected under §
9–1709 of this subtitle;
(iii) The covered electronic device manufacturer registration fee
collected under § 9–1728 of this subtitle;
(iv) The Paint Stewardship Program plan and annual report review
fees collected under § 9–1733(b) and (h) of this subtitle;
(V) THE POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT REGISTRATION
FEES COLLECTED UNDER § 9–2703 OF THIS TITLE;
[(v)] (VI) All fines and penalties collected under this subtitle AND §
9–2710 OF THIS TITLE;
[(vi)] (VII) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
[(vii)] (VIII) Any other money from any other source accepted for the
benefit of the Fund.
(3) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(4) The Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
(5) [At] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, AT the end of each fiscal year, any unspent or unencumbered balance in the

HOUSE BILL 69
Fund that exceeds $2,000,000 shall revert to the General Fund of the State in accordance
with § 7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(6) In accordance with the State budget, the Fund shall be used only:
(i) To provide grants to the counties to be used by the counties to
develop and implement local recycling plans;
(ii) To provide grants to counties that have addressed methods for
the separate collection and recycling of covered electronic devices in accordance with §
9–1703(c)(1) of this subtitle;
(iii) To provide grants to municipalities to be used by the
municipalities to implement local covered electronic device recycling programs;
(IV) TO COVER THE COSTS OF PLANNING, IMPLEMENTING,
ADMINISTERING, MONITORING, ENFORCING, AND EVALUATING THE
POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE
27 OF THIS TITLE;
[(iv)] (V) To cover the costs of the Paint Stewardship Program plan
review under § 9–1733(b) of this subtitle, the annual report review under § 9–1733(h) of
this subtitle, and associated costs for Program compliance oversight; and
[(v)] (VI) To carry out the purposes of the land management
administration.
(7) (I) THERE SHALL BE A SEPARATE ACCOUNT WITHIN THE FUND.
(II) THE SEPARATE ACCOUNT SHALL CONSIST OF:
1. ANY FEES COLLECTED FROM PRODUCERS OF
COVERED PRODUCTS UNDER § 9–2703 OF THIS TITLE; AND
2. ALL FINES AND PENALTIES COLLECTED UNDER §
9–2710 OF THIS TITLE.
(III) THE SEPARATE ACCOUNT SHALL BE USED ONLY TO:
1. REIMBURSE THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–2703(A)(4)(II)1 OF THIS TITLE; AND
2. COVER THE COSTS OF PLANNING, IMPLEMENTING,
ADMINISTERING, MONITORING, ENFORCING, AND EVALUATING THE

HOUSE BILL 69 5
POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE
27 OF THIS TITLE.
(IV) MONEY DEPOSITED INTO THE SEPARATE ACCOUNT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE AND
MAY NOT REVERT TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
[(7)] (8) (i) The Treasurer shall invest the money in the Fund in the
same manner as other State money may be invested.
(ii) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be credited to
the General Fund of the State.
SUBTITLE 27. POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT PROGRAM.
9–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COVERED PRODUCT” MEANS A PRODUCT THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE
POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT PERCENTAGE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) “HOUSEHOLD CLEANING PRODUCT” MEANS A PRODUCT THAT IS
LABELED OR MARKETED TO CLEAN, FRESHEN, OR REMOVE UNWANTED SUBSTANCES
SUCH AS DIRT, STAINS, OR OTHER IMPURITIES FROM OBJECTS, INTERIOR OR
EXTERIOR STRUCTURES, VEHICLES, POSSESSIONS, AND OTHER ENVIRONMENTS
ASSOCIATED WITH A HOUSEHOLD.
(2) “HOUSEHOLD CLEANING PRODUCT” INCLUDES:
(I) LIQUID SOAPS, LAUNDRY SOAPS, DETERGENTS, FABRIC
SOFTENERS, SURFACE POLISHES, AND STAIN REMOVERS; AND
(II) TEXTILE CLEANERS, CARPET CLEANERS, AND PET
CLEANERS AND TREATMENTS.
(D) (1) “PERSONAL CARE PRODUCT” MEANS A PRODUCT THAT IS
LABELED OR MARKETED FOR THE APPLICATION TO AN INDIVIDUAL IN ORDER TO
CLEAN, ALTER, OR MAINTAIN THE APPEARANCE OF THE INDIVIDUAL.
(2) “PERSONAL CARE PRODUCT” INCLUDES:

HOUSE BILL 69
(I) SHAMPOO, CONDITIONER, STYLING SPRAYS AND GELS, AND
OTHER HAIR CARE PRODUCTS;
(II) LOTION, MOISTURIZER, FACIAL TONER, AND OTHER SKIN
CARE PRODUCTS; AND
(III) LIQUID SOAP AND OTHER BODY CARE PRODUCTS.
(E) (1) “POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT” MEANS THE PORTION OF
A COVERED PRODUCT’S TOTAL WEIGHT THAT IS COMPOSED OF POSTCONSUMER
RECYCLED MATERIAL, AS DETERMINED BY A MATERIAL BALANCE APPROACH THAT
CALCULATES TOTAL POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED MATERIAL AS A PERCENTAGE OF
THE TOTAL WEIGHT OF THE COVERED PRODUCT.
(2) “POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE
PRECONSUMER OR POSTINDUSTRIAL SECONDARY WASTE MATERIAL OR MATERIALS
AND BY–PRODUCTS GENERATED FROM, AND COMMONLY USED WITHIN, AN ORIGINAL
MANUFACTURING AND FABRICATION PROCESS.
(F) “POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED MATERIAL” MEANS A MATERIAL OR
PRODUCT GENERATED BY HOUSEHOLDS OR BY COMMERCIAL, INDUSTRIAL, AND
INSTITUTIONAL FACILITIES IN THEIR ROLE AS END USERS OF THE MATERIAL OR
PRODUCT THAT HAS:
(1) BEEN USED FOR ITS INTENDED USE OR CAN NO LONGER BE USED
FOR ITS INTENDED USE, INCLUDING MATERIAL OR PRODUCT THAT HAS BEEN
RETURNED FROM THE DISTRIBUTION CHAIN; AND
(2) BEEN SEPARATED FROM THE SOLID WASTE STREAM FOR THE
PURPOSES OF COLLECTION AND RECYCLING.
(G) (1) “PRODUCER” MEANS A PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR COMPLYING
WITH THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) “PRODUCER” INCLUDES A FRANCHISOR OF A FRANCHISE
LOCATED IN THE STATE.
(3) “PRODUCER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) THE STATE, A COUNTY, A MUNICIPALITY, OR ANY OTHER
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE;

HOUSE BILL 69 7
(II) A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION THAT IS TAX EXEMPT UNDER
§ 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
(III) A SOCIAL WELFARE ORGANIZATION THAT IS TAX EXEMPT
UNDER § 501(C)(4) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
(IV) A FRANCHISEE THAT OPERATES A FRANCHISE IN THE
STATE;
(V) A PERSON THAT ANNUALLY SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE,
DISTRIBUTES, OR IMPORTS INTO THE COUNTRY FOR SALE IN THE STATE LESS THAN
1 TON OF A SINGLE CATEGORY OF COVERED PRODUCTS; OR
(VI) A PERSON THAT ANNUALLY SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE, OR
DISTRIBUTES ANY CATEGORY OF A COVERED PRODUCT IN THE STATE IF THE
PERSON’S AGGREGATE GLOBAL ANNUAL REVENUE IS LESS THAN $5,000,000.
(H) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE POSTCONSUMER RECYCLING CONTENT
PROGRAM.
9–2702.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THIS SECTION
APPLIES TO A PRODUCER THAT SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTES A
COVERED PRODUCT IN THE STATE.
(2) (I) IF THE COVERED PRODUCT IS SOLD UNDER THE
PRODUCER’S OWN BRAND OR LACKS IDENTIFICATION OF A BRAND, THE PRODUCER
IS THE PERSON WHO MANUFACTURES THE COVERED PRODUCT.
(II) IF THE COVERED PRODUCT IS MANUFACTURED BY A
PERSON OTHER THAN THE BRAND OWNER, THE PRODUCER IS THE PERSON WHO IS
THE LICENSEE OF A BRAND OR TRADEMARK UNDER WHICH A COVERED PRODUCT IS
SOLD, OFFERED FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTED IN THE STATE, WHETHER OR NOT THE
TRADEMARK IS REGISTERED IN THE STATE, UNLESS ANOTHER RESPONSIBLE
PERSON HAS CONTRACTUALLY ASSUMED RESPONSIBILITY AS THE PRODUCER.
(III) IF THERE IS NO PERSON DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OR (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH OVER WHOM THE STATE CAN CONSTITUTIONALLY
EXERCISE JURISDICTION, THE PRODUCER IS THE PERSON WHO IMPORTS OR
DISTRIBUTES THE COVERED PRODUCT IN THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 69
(3) IF ANOTHER PERSON CONTRACTUALLY ASSUMES
RESPONSIBILITY AS A PRODUCER UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE PRODUCER MUST PROVIDE A CERTIFIED COPY OF THE CONTRACT AGREEMENT
TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) A PRODUCER MAY NOT SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTE A
COVERED PRODUCT TO ANY PERSON IN THE STATE UNLESS:
(1) THE PRODUCT MEETS THE MINIMUM POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED
CONTENT PERCENTAGE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–2703 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
PRODUCER HAS, INDIVIDUALLY OR AS PART OF A REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION:
(I) REGISTERED WITH THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) SUBMITTED A REGISTRATION FEE TO THE DEPARTMENT.
9–2703.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, A
PRODUCER SHALL, INDIVIDUALLY OR AS PART OF A REPRESENTATIVE
ORGANIZATION, REGISTER WITH THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) ON OR BEFORE MAY 15 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, A
PRODUCER SHALL, INDIVIDUALLY OR AS PART OF A REPRESENTATIVE
ORGANIZATION, PAY THE REGISTRATION FEE ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT
UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AN ANNUAL
REGISTRATION FEE FOR EACH CATEGORY OF A COVERED PRODUCT.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, REGISTRATION FEES SHALL BE SET IN A MANNER THAT:
1. WILL PRODUCE FUNDS SUFFICIENT TO COVER THE
DEPARTMENT’S ESTIMATED COSTS OF PLANNING, IMPLEMENTING,
ADMINISTERING, MONITORING, ENFORCING, AND EVALUATING THE PROGRAM FOR
THE UPCOMING 1–YEAR PERIOD; AND
2. IS PROPORTIONAL TO THE PRODUCER’S SHARE OF
THE TOTAL POUNDS OF PLASTIC SOLD IN THE STATE IN EACH PRODUCT CATEGORY
FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR.

HOUSE BILL 69 9
(III) FOR THE FIRST YEAR OF THE PROGRAM’S OPERATION,
REGISTRATION FEES SHALL BE SET IN A MANNER THAT:
1. WILL PRODUCE FUNDS SUFFICIENT TO COVER THE
DEPARTMENT’S ESTIMATED COSTS OF PLANNING, IMPLEMENTING,
ADMINISTERING, MONITORING, ENFORCING, AND EVALUATING THE PROGRAM FOR
THE UPCOMING 1–YEAR PERIOD;
2. WILL PRODUCE FUNDS SUFFICIENT TO REIMBURSE
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE FOR THE ACTUAL COSTS THAT RESULT FROM
THE PROGRAM IN THAT YEAR; AND
3. IS PROPORTIONAL TO THE PRODUCER’S SHARE OF
THE TOTAL POUNDS OF PLASTIC SOLD IN THE STATE IN EACH PRODUCT CATEGORY
FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR.
(4) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IF, IN ANY YEAR, THE AMOUNT OF REGISTRATION FEE REVENUE
COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT EXCEEDS THE DEPARTMENT’S ACTUAL COSTS OF
PLANNING, IMPLEMENTING, ADMINISTERING, MONITORING, ENFORCING, AND
EVALUATING THE PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CARRY THE EXCESS
AMOUNT FORWARD FOR THE PURPOSE OF REDUCING REGISTRATION FEES FOR THE
FOLLOWING YEAR.
(II) FOR THE FIRST YEAR OF THE PROGRAM’S OPERATION,
REGISTRATION FEE REVENUE SHALL BE USED:
1. NOTWITHSTANDING § 9–1707(F)(7)(IV) OF THIS
TITLE, TO REIMBURSE THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE FOR ACTUAL COSTS THAT
RESULT FROM THE PROGRAM FOR THAT YEAR; AND
2. TO COVER THE DEPARTMENT’S ACTUAL COSTS OF
PLANNING, IMPLEMENTING, ADMINISTERING, MONITORING, ENFORCING, AND
EVALUATING THE PROGRAM.
(5) IF, IN ANY GIVEN YEAR, THE AMOUNT OF REGISTRATION FEE
REVENUE COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IS INSUFFICIENT TO COVER THE
DEPARTMENT’S ACTUAL COSTS OF PLANNING, IMPLEMENTING, ADMINISTERING,
MONITORING, ENFORCING, AND EVALUATING THE PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL ADJUST REGISTRATION FEES FOR THE FOLLOWING YEAR TO COVER THE
DEPARTMENT’S ACTUAL COSTS.

HOUSE BILL 69
(B) THE REGISTRATION SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION REGARDING:
(1) EACH PRODUCER INCLUDED UNDER THE REGISTRATION;
(2) EACH BRAND OF A COVERED PRODUCT INCLUDED UNDER THE
REGISTRATION;
(3) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF COVERED PRODUCTS SOLD IN THE STATE
IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR, INCLUDING THE TOTAL
NUMBER BY EACH CATEGORY OF A COVERED PRODUCT;
(4) THE TOTAL WEIGHT OF COVERED PRODUCTS SOLD IN THE STATE
IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR, INCLUDING THE TOTAL WEIGHT
BY EACH CATEGORY OF A COVERED PRODUCT;
(5) THE AVERAGE PERCENTAGE OF POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED
CONTENT FOR EACH CATEGORY OF A COVERED PRODUCT SOLD IN THE STATE IN THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR;
(6) PROOF OF THIRD–PARTY CERTIFICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(7) ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT
IN REGULATION.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, A
PRODUCER SHALL INCLUDE PROOF OF THIRD–PARTY CERTIFICATION OF THE
POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT OF EACH COVERED PRODUCT INCLUDED IN
THE REGISTRATION IN A MANNER REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE CERTIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE COMPLETED BY AN INDEPENDENT, ACCREDITED
CERTIFYING BODY AS REQUIRED BY THE INTERNATIONAL ORGANIZATION FOR
STANDARDIZATION.
(D) ANY SALES DATA SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT TO COMPLY WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE TREATED AS CONFIDENTIAL AND
PROPRIETARY, AND MAY NOT BE DISCLOSED EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY
LAW.
9–2704.

HOUSE BILL 69 11
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO BEVERAGE CONTAINERS THAT ARE
PRIMARILY COMPOSED OF ONE OR MORE PLASTIC RESINS AND INTENDED TO
CONTAIN BEVERAGES UP TO 2 GALLONS IN CAPACITY, INCLUDING AN INDIVIDUAL,
SEALABLE, SEPARATE BOTTLE, CAN, JAR, CARTON, OR OTHER BEVERAGE
CONTAINER THAT IS CAPABLE OF MAINTAINING ITS SHAPE WHEN EMPTY.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) REFILLABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS, INCLUDING
CONTAINERS THAT ARE SUFFICIENTLY DURABLE FOR MULTIPLE ROTATIONS OF
THEIR ORIGINAL PURPOSE OR A SIMILAR PURPOSE AND ARE INTENDED TO
FUNCTION IN A SYSTEM OF REUSE;
(II) LINERS, BLADDERS, CAPS, CORKS, CLOSURES, LABELS, AND
OTHER ITEMS ADDED TO THE BOTTLE OR CONTAINER BUT THAT ARE SEPARATE
FROM THE STRUCTURE OF THE BOTTLE OR CONTAINER;
(III) CONTAINERS CERTIFIED BY THE BIODEGRADABLE
PRODUCTS INSTITUTE AS COMPOSTABLE; OR
(IV) CONTAINERS USED FOR INFANT FORMULA, MEDICAL
BEVERAGES, OR FORTIFIED ORAL NUTRITIONAL SUPPLEMENTS.
(B) THE MINIMUM POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT PERCENTAGE
REQUIREMENT FOR PLASTIC BEVERAGE CONTAINERS IS:
(1) FROM JANUARY 1, 2027, TO DECEMBER 31, 2028, BOTH
INCLUSIVE, 15%;
(2) FROM JANUARY 1, 2029, TO DECEMBER 31, 2032, BOTH
INCLUSIVE, 25%; AND
(3) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2033, 50%.
9–2705.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO RIGID PLASTIC CONTAINERS OR OTHER
NONDURABLE CONTAINERS THAT ARE PRIMARILY COMPOSED OF ONE OR MORE
PLASTIC RESINS, ARE CAPABLE OF MAINTAINING THEIR SHAPE WHEN EMPTY, AND
ARE USED TO PACKAGE OR STORE FOOD.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:

HOUSE BILL 69
(I) REFILLABLE RIGID PLASTIC FOOD CONTAINERS,
INCLUDING CONTAINERS THAT ARE SUFFICIENTLY DURABLE FOR MULTIPLE
ROTATIONS OF THEIR ORIGINAL PURPOSE OR A SIMILAR PURPOSE AND ARE
INTENDED TO FUNCTION IN A SYSTEM OF REUSE;
(II) RIGID PLASTIC CONTAINERS THAT CONTAIN DIETARY
SUPPLEMENTS; OR
(III) A PLASTIC BEVERAGE CONTAINER UNDER § 9–2704 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) THE MINIMUM POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT PERCENTAGE
REQUIREMENT FOR RIGID PLASTIC CONTAINERS USED TO PACKAGE OR STORE FOOD
IS:
(1) FROM JANUARY 1, 2027, TO DECEMBER 31, 2030, BOTH
INCLUSIVE, 15%;
(2) FROM JANUARY 1, 2031, TO DECEMBER 31, 2033, BOTH
INCLUSIVE, 30%; AND
(3) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2034, 40%.
9–2706.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO RIGID PLASTIC CONTAINERS OR OTHER
NONDURABLE CONTAINERS THAT ARE PRIMARILY COMPOSED OF ONE OR MORE
PLASTIC RESINS, ARE CAPABLE OF MAINTAINING THEIR SHAPE WHEN EMPTY, AND
ARE USED FOR HOUSEHOLD CLEANING PRODUCTS OR PERSONAL CARE PRODUCTS.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) REFILLABLE HOUSEHOLD CLEANING AND PERSONAL CARE
PRODUCT CONTAINERS, INCLUDING CONTAINERS THAT ARE SUFFICIENTLY
DURABLE FOR MULTIPLE ROTATIONS OF THEIR ORIGINAL PURPOSE OR A SIMILAR
PURPOSE AND ARE INTENDED TO FUNCTION IN A SYSTEM OF REUSE; OR
(II) RIGID PLASTIC CONTAINERS THAT ARE MEDICAL DEVICES
OR THAT ARE USED FOR:
1. MEDICAL PRODUCTS THAT ARE REQUIRED TO BE
STERILE; OR

HOUSE BILL 69 13
2. NONPRESCRIPTION OR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS.
(B) THE MINIMUM POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT PERCENTAGE
REQUIREMENT FOR RIGID PLASTIC CONTAINERS USED FOR HOUSEHOLD CLEANING
OR PERSONAL CARE PRODUCTS IS:
(1) FROM JANUARY 1, 2027, TO DECEMBER 31, 2030, BOTH
INCLUSIVE, 25%;
(2) FROM JANUARY 1, 2031, TO DECEMBER 31, 2034, BOTH
INCLUSIVE, 30%; AND
(3) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2035, 35%.
9–2707.
THE DEPARTMENT MAY GRANT A TEMPORARY WAIVER FROM THE
REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO A PRODUCER IF THE DEPARTMENT
DETERMINES THAT ACHIEVING COMPLIANCE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE WOULD
PRESENT AN UNDUE HARDSHIP OR A PRACTICAL DIFFICULTY NOT GENERALLY
APPLICABLE TO OTHER PRODUCERS IN SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES.
9–2708.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(1) CONDUCT AUDITS AND INVESTIGATIONS FOR THE PURPOSE OF
ENSURING COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) PARTICIPATE IN THE ESTABLISHMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF
A MULTISTATE CLEARINGHOUSE TO ASSIST IN CARRYING OUT THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING TO:
(I) HELP COORDINATE THE REVIEW OF REGISTRATIONS,
WAIVER REQUESTS, AND CERTIFICATIONS; AND
(II) IMPLEMENT EDUCATION AND OUTREACH ACTIVITIES.
(B) ON AN ANNUAL BASIS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS
WEBSITE:
(1) A LIST OF EACH REGISTERED PRODUCER OF A COVERED
PRODUCT AND ASSOCIATED BRAND NAMES;

HOUSE BILL 69
(2) THE COMPLIANCE STATUS FOR EACH REGISTERED PRODUCER;
AND
(3) ANY OTHER INFORMATION DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
9–2709.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
9–2710.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
PROVISIONS OF §§ 9–334 THROUGH 9–342 OF THIS TITLE APPLY TO ENFORCE
VIOLATIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A PENALTY MAY NOT BE IMPOSED ON A PRODUCER UNDER THIS
SECTION FOR FAILING TO REGISTER WITH THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 9–2703 OF
THIS SUBTITLE UNLESS:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT FIRST ISSUES A WRITTEN NOTICE OF
VIOLATION TO THE PRODUCER; AND
(II) THE PRODUCER HAS NOT REGISTERED WITH THE
DEPARTMENT WITHIN 90 DAYS OF RECEIPT OF THE WRITTEN NOTICE.
(B) (1) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, A PRODUCER THAT DOES NOT
MEET THE MINIMUM POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT PERCENTAGE
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO AN
ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY EACH YEAR THE VIOLATION OCCURS.
(2) AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL EQUAL THE PRODUCT OF MULTIPLYING:
(I) THE TOTAL POUNDS OF PLASTIC USED IN THE PRODUCT
CATEGORY MULTIPLIED BY THE RELEVANT MINIMUM POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED
CONTENT PERCENTAGE, LESS THE TOTAL POUNDS OF POSTCONSUMER RECYCLING
PLASTIC USED; AND
(II) 20 CENTS.

HOUSE BILL 69 15
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADJUST THE ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY
AMOUNT IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AS NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT THE
ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY EXCEEDS THE COST OF COMPLIANCE.
(4) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY GRANT A REDUCTION IN THE
ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTIES IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IF A PRODUCER
SUBMITS TO THE DEPARTMENT A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN AND THE
DEPARTMENT APPROVES THE CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN.
(II) A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL INCLUDE:
1. THE REASONS THE PRODUCER WILL FAIL TO MEET OR
FAILED TO MEET THE MINIMUM POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT PERCENTAGE
REQUIREMENTS; AND
2. THE STEPS THAT THE PRODUCER WILL TAKE TO
COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS DURING THE SUBSEQUENT REPORTING YEAR.
(III) IN DETERMINING WHETHER TO GRANT A REDUCTION IN THE
ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTIES, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER:
1. ANOMALOUS MARKET CONDITIONS;
2. DISRUPTION IN SUPPLY OR LACK OF SUPPLY OF
RECYCLED PLASTICS;
3. EFFORTS UNDERTAKEN BY THE PRODUCER TO
INCREASE THE RECYCLABILITY OF THE PRODUCER’S PRODUCT AND THE SUPPLY OF
POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED PLASTIC; AND
4. OTHER FACTORS THAT PREVENT A PRODUCER FROM
MEETING THE MINIMUM POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT PERCENTAGE
REQUIREMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Department of the Environment shall contract with a research university
or an independent third–party consultant to:
(1) evaluate the implementation of this Act and its effectiveness in
stimulating the recycling markets in the State and displacing virgin plastic with
postconsumer recycled content; and

HOUSE BILL 69
(2) make recommendations for legislative or administrative actions, if any,
necessary to further the purpose of this Act.
(b) On or before October 1, 2030, the Department shall:
(1) report the findings and recommendations of the research university or
independent third–party consultant to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, the Senate Education, Energy, and the Environment
Committee and the House Environment and Transportation Committee; and
(2) post the findings and recommendations on the Department’s website.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.